Hawaii statutes.
§431:7-308 Dividends and substitutions.
While solvent and complying with this part, an insurer shall be entitled:

(1) To collect and receive interest and dividends
accruing on the securities so held on deposit for its account, and

(2) From time to time to exchange and substitute for
any of such securities, other securities eligible for deposit and of at least
equal value. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next